Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska39-1306.02
Federal aid; political subdivisions; allotment; department; duration; notice.

When any political or governmental subdivision or any public corporation of this state has an allotment of federal-aid funds made available to it by the federal government, the department shall give notice to the political or governmental subdivision of the amount of such funds the department has allotted to it, and, that the duration of the allotment to the political or governmental subdivision or public corporation is for not less than an eighteen-month period, which notice shall state the last date of such allotment to the subdivision or political corporation. The department shall give notice a second time six months before the last date of such allotment of the impending six months expiration of the allotment and of the amount of funds remaining.

Laws 1969, c. 330, § 2, p. 1185;

Laws 2017, LB339, § 123.